Oklahoma, session 2025, SB857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 15-133 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For purposes of this section:


1. “Alert” means a notification generated by an automatic


license plate reader system indicating that a vehicle passed an


automatic license plate reader system camera with a license plate or


vehicle characteristics that match data held by the National Crime


Information Center or other database or hot list;



Req. No. 806 Page 1


2. “Automatic license plate reader system” means a system of


one or more law-enforcement-controlled cameras combined with


computer algorithms to convert images of license plates into


computer-readable data;


3. “Hot list” means a list of license plates or vehicle


characteristics against which vehicles passing by automatic license


plate reader system cameras are checked for matches;


4. “Law enforcement agency” means any county sheriff, municipal


police department, the Oklahoma Highway Patrol, and any state or


local public body that employs public safety personnel;


5. “License plate reader data” means the global positioning


device coordinates, date and time, photograph, license plate number,


and vehicle characteristics captured by an automatic license plate


reader system; and


6. “Highway right-of-way” is a public road being maintained by


the Department of Transportation.


B. In accordance with applicable state and federal laws


governing the use and management of highway rights-of-way and


subject to the approval of the Federal Highway Administration as


required by federal law, automatic license plate reader systems may


be utilized on highway rights-of-way to the extent that such use is


consistent with the continued use, operation, maintenance, and


safety of the highway facility and does not interfere with the free


and safe flow of traffic. Except as provided in Sections 7-606.1

Req. No. 806 Page 2


and 7-606.2 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, such devices shall


not be used to enforce state or local traffic violations or to issue


citations for such violations.


C. Prior to the installation of an automatic license plate


reader system on a highway right-of-way, a law enforcement agency


shall obtain a permit from the Department of Transportation that


meets standards set by the Department.


D. In addition to Sections 7-606.1 and 7-606.2 of Title 47 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, operation of and access to an automatic


license plate reader system by law enforcement agencies shall be for


official law enforcement purposes only.


E. Prior to the use of an automatic license plate reader


system, a law enforcement agency shall adopt and make publicly


available a written policy governing the use of the automatic


license plate reader system that includes, but is not limited to:


1. Supervisory oversight of the automatic license plate reader


system;


2. A training protocol for automatic license plate reader


system users;


3. A protocol for ensuring hot lists stay up to date;


4. Rules for access to and security of license plate reader


data;


5. Rules for retention and destruction of license plate reader


data; and

Req. No. 806 Page 3


6. An audit schedule and process to ensure that the system is


used in accordance with this section and agency policy.


F. A law enforcement agency using an automatic license plate


reader system must comply with the following:


1. Upon receipt of an alert and prior to performing a traffic


stop, an officer, dispatcher, or other law enforcement agency


employee shall visually confirm that the scanned plate matches the


alert with regard to plate letters, numbers, and the issuing state


and confirm that the stop meets criteria laid out in the policies of


the law enforcement agency and applicable law;


2. License plate reader data shall be deleted within thirty


(30) days of being recorded in such a manner that the record is


destroyed and not recoverable, unless the record is a part of an


ongoing investigation, in which case the data shall be retained and


destroyed in accordance with applicable records retention laws;


3. License plate reader data shall be encrypted in transmission


and at rest with industry-recognized encryption protocols to


safeguard against unauthorized access. The data shall be stored in


a manner that meets or exceeds the requirements set forth by current


best practices to ensure comprehensive security measures including,


but not limited to, physical security, access control, and regular


security assessments;


4. Any license plate or vehicle added to a hot list in order to


trigger an alert and any search performed of license plate reader

Req. No. 806 Page 4


data shall be supported by a legitimate, specific, and documented


law enforcement purpose;


5. Access logs for the automatic license plate reader system


shall be maintained to provide a clear audit trail for oversight and


accountability purposes;


6. A law enforcement agency authorized to use an automatic


license plate reader system pursuant to this section shall own the


license plate reader data and shall not sell license plate reader


data for any purpose; and


7. Law enforcement agencies may share license plate reader data


with other law enforcement agencies for legitimate law enforcement


purposes.


G. The Department of Transportation shall promulgate rules to


administer the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-806 CN 1/19/2025 5:44:43 AM















Req. No. 806 Page 5